Mississippi statutes. Title 21. Municipalities
Municipal Fire Protection Fund
[Repealed]

§§ 21-25-41 through 21-25-45.
Repealed.

Repealed, by Laws, 1982, ch. 351, § 19, eff from and after July 1, 1982.

§21-25-41. [Codes, 1942, § 3494.7; Laws, 1950, ch. 415, §§ 1-4; Laws, 1954, ch. 344, § 4 [¶ 4]; Laws, 1966, ch. 595, § 1; Laws, 1971, ch. 342, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 496, § 1 (a, b)].

§21-25-43. [Codes, 1942, § 3494.7; Laws, 1950, ch. 415, §§ 1-4; Laws, 1954, ch. 344, § 4 [¶ 4]; Laws, 1966, ch. 595, § 1; Laws, 1971, ch. 342, § 1; Laws, 1981, ch. 365, § 1].

§21-25-45. [Codes, 1942, § 3494.7; Laws, 1950, ch. 415, §§ 1-4; Laws, 1954, ch. 344, § 4 [¶ 4]; Laws, 1966, ch. 595, § 1; Laws, 1971, ch. 342, § 1].